Utah statutes.
73-3b-205.   Issuance of recovery permit -- Criteria -- Conditions.
The state engineer:
(1)  shall issue the recovery permit if the state engineer determines that:
(a)  the proposed recovery of artificially recharged water will not impair any
existing water right;
(b)  the applicant is the holder of an approved recharge permit or recovery
permit, or if the applicant does not hold the recharge permit, has a valid
agreement with the owner of the recharge permit to divert and use the
recovered water; and
(c)  the recovery point of diversion is located within the area of hydrologic
impact of the recharge project, as determined by the state engineer; and
(2)  may attach to the permit any conditions the state engineer determines are
appropriate.
